Massachusetts, session 194th, H3232.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting into 
Section 6, the following subsection: (aa) Local Newspaper Subscription Credit. 
Section 6.(aa) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings: 
i. “Annual Dollar Limitation,” the credit allowed to any taxpayer for any taxable year 
shall not exceed $250. 
ii. “Applicable Percentage,” in the case of the first taxable year to which this section 
applies, 80 percent, and, in the case of any subsequent taxable year, 50 percent. 
iii. “Local Newspaper,” any print or digital publication if  

of 5 10  (a) the primary content of such publication is original content derived from primary 
sources and relating to news and current events, 
(b) such publication primarily serves the needs of a regional or local community in the 
Commonwealth, 
(c) the publisher of such publication employs at least one local news journalist who 
resides in such regional or local community, and 
(d) the publisher of such publication employs not greater than 500 employees. 
bb. There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for the 
taxable year an amount equal to the applicable percentage of amounts paid or incurred for 
subscriptions to one or more local newspapers for the personal use of the taxpayer and any 
dependents up to the annual dollar limitation.  
cc. In the case of any print or digital publication which is published by any organization 
described in section 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)) and 
exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, such publication shall be 
treated as a local newspaper only if the publication of print and digital publications is the primary 
activity of such organization. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the 
following:  
Section 38KK. Payroll Credit for Compensation of Local News Journalists. 
Section 38KK. As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings:  

of 5 31  (i) “Applicable percentage,” in the case of each of the first four calendar quarters to 
which this section applies, 50 percent and, in the case of each calendar quarter thereafter, 30 
percent. 
(ii) “Eligible local newspaper publisher,” any employer if substantially all of the gross 
receipts of such employer for such calendar quarter are derived in the trade or business of 
publishing local newspapers as defined in Section 6 of Chapter 62. 
(iii) “Local news journalist,” with respect to any eligible local newspaper publisher for 
any calendar quarter, any individual who provides at least 100 hours of service as a local news 
journalist as defined in Section 6 of Chapter 62 during such calendar quarter to such eligible 
local newspaper publisher. 
(iv) “Department,” the Department of Revenue. 
(a) In the case of an eligible local newspaper publisher, there shall be allowed as a credit 
against the taxes imposed by this chapter for each calendar quarter an amount equal to the 
applicable percentage of wages paid by such publisher to local news journalists for such calendar 
quarter. 
(b) The amount of wages paid with respect to any individual which may be taken into 
account during any calendar quarter by the eligible local newspaper publisher shall not exceed 
$12,500. 
(c) The credit allowed with respect to any calendar quarter shall not exceed the applicable 
employment taxes on the wages paid with respect to the employment of all the employees of the 
eligible local newspaper publisher for such calendar quarter. 

of 5 52  (d) If the amount of the credit exceeds the limitation of paragraph (c) for any calendar 
quarter, such excess shall be treated as an overpayment that shall be refunded. Any amounts due 
to the employer under this paragraph shall be treated in the same manner as a refund due from a 
credit provision referred to in subsection (b) of this section. 
(e) This section shall not apply with respect to any eligible local newspaper publisher for 
any calendar quarter if such person elects not to have this section apply. 
(f) The Department shall waive any penalty under section 35A of Chapter 62C of the 
General Laws for any failure to make a deposit of any applicable employment taxes if the 
Department determines that such failure was due to the reasonable anticipation of the credit 
allowed under this section. 
(g) This section shall only apply to calendar quarters during the first 5 calendar years 
beginning after the date of the enactment of this Act. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the 
following  Section 38LL. Credit for Advertising in Local Newspapers and Local Media. As used 
in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:  
(i) "Eligible small business,”  any business for any taxable year if the average number of 
full-time employees employed by such a business during such taxable year was less than 50. 
(ii) “Applicable percentage,”  in the case of the first taxable year to which this section 
applies, 80 percent and, in the case of any subsequent taxable year, 50 percent. 
(a) In the case of any eligible small business, the local media advertising credit 
determined under this section for any taxable year is an amount equal to the applicable 

of 5 73 percentage of the qualified local media advertising expenses paid or incurred by the taxpayer 
during such taxable year. 
(b) The credit allowed under subsection (a) to any taxpayer for any taxable year shall not 
exceed, in the case of the first taxable year to which this section applies, $5,000, and, in the case 
of any subsequent taxable year, $2,500. 
(c) This section shall only apply to calendar quarters during the first 5 calendar years 
beginning after the date of the enactment of this Act.